test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-glossing.yaml
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: mshkimdenyshing
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: mshkimdenyshan
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+4: mshkimdensshan
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: mshkimdensshing
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: mshkimdensshan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+4: mshkimdenybaniin
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: mshkimdenybaniing
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: mshkimdenybaniin
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+4: mshkimdensbaniin
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: mshkimdensbaniing
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: mshkimdensbaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     mshkimot+NI+Pej+Prt+4: mshkimdaashbaniin
     mshkimot+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: mshkimdaashbaniing
     mshkimot+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: mshkimdaashbaniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: nmashkmodenymish
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: nmashkmodensmish
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gmashkmodenymish
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gmashkmodensmish
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: mashkmodenymish
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: mashkmodensmish
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: mashkmodenymish
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: mashkmodensmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmashkmodenyminaa
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmashkmodensminaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmashkmodenyminaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmashkmodenymiwaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmashkmodensminaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmashkmodensmiwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: mashkmodenymiwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4: mashkmodenymini
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: mashkmodensmiwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: mashkmodensmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: nmashkmodenymiba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodenymidig
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: nmashkmodensmiba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodensmidig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gmashkmodenymiba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenymidig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gmashkmodensmiba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodensmidig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: mashkmodenymiba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenymidig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: mashkmodensmiba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensmidig
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: mashkmodenymiba
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenymidig
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: mashkmodensmiba
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: nmashkmodenyman
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: nmashkmodenyming
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: nmashkmodenyman
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: nmashkmodensman
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: nmashkmodensming
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: nmashkmodensman
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: gmashkmodenyman
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gmashkmodenyming
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gmashkmodenyman
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: gmashkmodensman
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gmashkmodensming
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gmashkmodensman
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: mashkmodenyman
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: mashkmodenyming
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: mashkmodenyman
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: mashkmodensman
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: mashkmodensming
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: mashkmodensman
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: mashkmodenyman
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: mashkmodenyming
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: mashkmodenyman
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: mashkmodensman
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: mashkmodensming
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: mashkmodensman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl: nmashkmodenyshinaa
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: nmashkmodensshinaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gmashkmodenyshinaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gmashkmodenyshiwaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gmashkmodensshinaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gmashkmodensshiwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl: mashkmodenyshiwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+3+4: mashkmodenyshini
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: mashkmodensshiwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4: mashkmodensshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: nmashkmodenyshiba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodenyshidig
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: nmashkmodensshiba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodensshidig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: gmashkmodenyshiba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenyshidig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: gmashkmodensshiba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodensshidig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: mashkmodenyshiba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenyshidig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: mashkmodensshiba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensshidig
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: mashkmodenyshiba
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenyshidig
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: mashkmodensshiba
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+4: nmashkmodenyshan
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: nmashkmodenyshing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: nmashkmodenyshan
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+4: nmashkmodensshan
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: nmashkmodensshing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: nmashkmodensshan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+4: gmashkmodenyshan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: gmashkmodenyshing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: gmashkmodenyshan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+4: gmashkmodensshan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: gmashkmodensshing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: gmashkmodensshan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+4: mashkmodenyshan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: mashkmodenyshing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: mashkmodenyshan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+4: mashkmodensshan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: mashkmodensshing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: mashkmodensshan
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+4: mashkmodenyshan
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: mashkmodenyshing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: mashkmodenyshan
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+4: mashkmodensshan
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: mashkmodensshing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: mashkmodensshan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt: nmashkmodenynaanba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodenynaandig
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: nmashkmodensnaanba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodensnaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodenynaanba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenynaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodenywaaba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenywaadig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodensnaanba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodensnaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodenswaaba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenswaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt: mashkmodenywaaba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenywaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+3+4+Prt: mashkmodenyniwba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenyniwdig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: mashkmodenswaaba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenswaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt: mashkmodensniwba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+4: nmashkmodenynaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Loc: nmashkmodenynaaning
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Pl: nmashkmodenynaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+4: nmashkmodensnaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: nmashkmodensnaaning
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: nmashkmodensnaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+4: gmashkmodenynaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodenynaaning
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodenynaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+4: gmashkmodenywaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodenywaang
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodenywaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+4: gmashkmodensnaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodensnaaning
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodensnaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+4: gmashkmodenswaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodenswaang
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodenswaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+4: mashkmodenywaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Loc: mashkmodenywaang
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Pl: mashkmodenywaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+3+4+4: mashkmodenyniwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+3+4+Loc: mashkmodenyniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+3+4+Pl: mashkmodenyniwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+4: mashkmodenswaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: mashkmodenswaang
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: mashkmodenswaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+3+4+4: mashkmodensniwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+3+4+Loc: mashkmodensniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+3+4+Pl: mashkmodensniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+4: nmashkmodenybaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodenybaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodenybaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+4: nmashkmodensbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodensbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodensbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+4: gmashkmodenybaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenybaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenybaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+4: gmashkmodensbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+4: mashkmodenybaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenybaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenybaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+4: mashkmodensbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensbaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensbaniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+4: mashkmodenybaniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenybaniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenybaniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+4: mashkmodensbaniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensbaniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nmashkmodaamshinaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gmashkmodaamshinaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gmashkmodaamshiwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: mashkmodaamshiwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: mashkmodaamshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nmashkmodaamshiba
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodaamshidig
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gmashkmodaamshiba
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodaamshidig
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: mashkmodaamshiba
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaamshidig
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: mashkmodaamshiba
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaamshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: nmashkmodaamshan
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nmashkmodaamshing
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nmashkmodaamshan
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: gmashkmodaamshan
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gmashkmodaamshing
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gmashkmodaamshan
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: mashkmodaamshan
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: mashkmodaamshing
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: mashkmodaamshan
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: mashkmodaamshan
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: mashkmodaamshing
